Hawaii, session 2026, GM1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that medical debt has
become a widespread issue in the State. According to a 2022
report from the Peterson-KFF Health System Tracker, more than
one in twenty adults in the State have outstanding medical debt
on their credit report. In states and cities that have acquired
and forgiven unpaid medical debt, most of the forgiven debt was
owed by those with health insurance, further suggesting that
despite many families in the State having health insurance
coverage, inability to pay medical debt is a serious problem.
The legislature further finds that medical debt is a social
determinant of health as patients with burdensome medical debt
often delay the care they need, may experience issues obtaining
employment and housing, have difficulty escaping poverty, and
experience increased mental stress.
The legislature also finds and declares that the
appropriation in this Act is in the public interest and for the
public health, safety, and general welfare of the State. Due to
2026-2507 SB3025 GDI SMA-l.docx
iiBiiiiiiiiHiiniiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2 S.B. NO. 2?^
C.D. 1
a rising cost of living and a health care system built on a
for-profit model, many families are never able to repay medical
debt.
The legislature recognizes that due to the significant
amount of outstanding debt owed to hospitals and other health
care providers, a secondary market has emerged in which
commercial debt buyers purchase outstanding and dormant debt
owed to health care providers and take aggressive action to
collect from families who find themselves unable to pay, further
exacerbating the severity of the medical debt crisis.
However, the legislature further finds that twenty-seven
states and cities in the United States have partnered with a
nonprofit organization that has successfully purchased billions
of dollars in medical debt from health care providers and
collection agencies for about 0.01 per cent of the overall cost
and abolished the respective patients' debts altogether. Health
care providers whose debt is sold to third parties for
abolishment can equally benefit by receiving revenue for dormant
patient accounts, while mitigating the effects of social
determinants of health and enhancing community well-being.
2026-2507 SB3025 GDI SMA-l.docx 2
iHinmiiiiiiiiniiniiinHii

Page 3 S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
The legislature finds that a medical debt consolidation and
cancellation non-profit organization has already acquired the
unpaid medical debt of 50,016 residents of the State, totaling
$91,310,664. This includes 39,401 individuals on Oahu, 6,654
individuals on Hawaii island, 3,597 individuals on Maui,
Molokai, and Lanai, and three hundred sixteen individuals on
Kauai.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the
office of wellness and resilience to develop, implement, and
oversee the administration of a medical debt acquisition and
forgiveness program to acquire and forgive outstanding medical
debt for certain Hawaii residents, subject to the availability
of program funds.
SECTION 2. Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part XXI to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§346- Medical debt acquisition and forgiveness
program. (a) The office may develop, implement, and administer
a medical debt acquisition and forgiveness program to acquire
and forgive outstanding medical debt of residents of the State
2026-2507 SB3025 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
IHlIIIHIIHiaHiniMI

Page 4 3025
S.B. NO.
S.D.2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
that is identified as available for acquisition, subject to the
availability of program funds.
(b) The office may partner with other relevant state
agencies and programs to develop, implement, and administer the
program.
■ (c) '^he program shall:
(1) Acquire and forgive the medical debt of individuals
who are residents of the State;
(A) With a household income less than or equal to
four hundred per cent of the federal poverty
level for the State; and
(B) With an adjusted gross income of less than
$100£000 who haye a medi^cad^debt balarice of not
less than five per cent of their household
income; and
(2) Ensure that any specific personally identifiable
information or protected health information is
collected in compliance with applicable federal and
state laws, regulations, and rules, and is used only
for the purposes of acquiring and satisfying or
discharging medical debt, or providing financial
2026-2507 SB3025 GDI SMA-l.docx
nniimiMiiiBiMHniii

Page 5 S.B. NO. 3025
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
education, insurance enrollment assistance, preventive
measures, or similar support services. Information
collected that is subject to this paragraph shall be
confidential and not disclosed under chapter 92F
without the consent of the individual or as otherwise
provided by law.
(d) The office may, without regard to chapter 103D or
103F, as applicable, contract with entities that hold existing
medical debt of state residents and have demonstrated experience
and success partnering with hospitals and health systems in
acquiring and satisfying or forgiving outstanding medical debt
on behalf of state and county governments for the purposes of
developing, implementing, and administering the medical debt
acquisition and forgiveness program.
(e) Any acquisition and forgiveness of medical debt under
the program shall be negotiated to ensure the best possible
value for the State.
(f) The office may receive appropriations from the
legislature, private funds, or federal funds for the purpose of
acquiring and forgiving outstanding medical debt pursuant to
this section."
2026-2507 SB3025 CDl SMA-l.docx
MoiiiMiiiHiiiiBfniiiin

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. The office shall submit a report of its
progress in developing, implementing, and administering the
medical debt acquisition and forgiveness program, including any
proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty
days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
office of wellness and resilience to develop, implement, and
administer the medical debt acquisition and forgiveness program
established pursuant to section 2 of this Act to acquire and
forgive outstanding medical debt for certain individuals who are
residents of the State; provided that the appropriation made by
this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for
which the appropriation is made; provided further that all
moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028,
shall lapse as of that date.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of
wellness and resilience for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-2507 SB3025 CDl SMA-l.docx 6
IHHniHlllliiNMgHIMHinH

Page 7 3025
S.B. NO
oc
X
O
p
p
p
o
or
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026,
2026-2507 SB3025 CDl SMA-l.docx

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 9th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3025, S.D. 2, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
205-26

SB No. 3025, SD 2, HD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives